Utah statutes.
67-3-4.   Appropriations not to be diverted from purposes.

No appropriation and no surplus of any appropriation shall be diverted from any account to any other account, except as provided by law, and the money appropriated, or so much as may be necessary, shall be applied to the payment of the item for which the appropriation is made and nothing else.



No Change Since 1953

